Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law
§ 81-12-57.
Conversion of association organized under state law or of federal association into capital stock association.

If the board of directors determines, and the commissioner concurs, that substantial business benefit to the association will or may result, and if federal law, regulations or administrative rulings authorize federal associations to convert to capital stock associations, the voting members of a mutual association organized pursuant to this chapter, or otherwise subject to the provisions of this chapter or a federal mutual savings or savings and loan association (hereinafter in this subsection referred to as a “federal association”) located in this state may vote to convert the association into a total or partial capital stock association by adopting a plan of conversion which is approved by the commissioner.

The plan of conversion must be approved at a meeting of voting members called to consider such action by an affirmative vote of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of votes eligible to be cast. The commissioner may approve or disapprove the plan of conversion in his discretion, but he shall not approve the plan unless he finds that the plan is fair and equitable to members of the association and that the interests of the savings account holders and the public are adequately protected. Notice of the meeting, giving the time, place and purpose thereof, together with a proxy statement and proxy form approved by the commissioner, covering all matters to be brought before the meeting, shall be mailed at least thirty (30) days prior thereto to the commissioner and to each voting member at his last address as shown on the books of the association. The notice shall advise the savings account holders of their right to the public hearing provided in Section 81- 12-59.

Copies of the minutes of the meeting of members, verified by the affidavit of the secretary or assistant secretary of the association, shall be filed in the office of the department and with the appropriate federal regulatory authority within a reasonable time after the meeting. When so filed, the verified copies of the minutes are presumptive evidence of the holding of the meeting and of the action taken. Any member or stockholder challenging the accuracy of such minutes by sworn objection may appeal to the commissioner.

The directors of the association shall execute and file with the supervisory authority proposed articles of incorporation as provided for in Section 81-12-25, together with an application for conversion and a firm commitment for, or evidence of, insurance of deposits and other accounts of a withdrawable type. The articles shall contain a statement that the corporation resulted from the conversion of a mutual or federal association to a capital stock association. If approved by the commissioner, he shall affix the same to the articles of incorporation. An authenticated copy of the articles of incorporation shall be filed with the Secretary of State and one (1) copy of the articles of incorporation and the certificate of incorporation shall be returned to the association. The association shall cease to be a mutual association at the time and on the date specified in the approved articles of incorporation.

All the provisions regarding property and other rights contained in Section 81-12-53 shall apply to the conversion of a mutual or federal association to a capital stock association, so that the capital stock association shall be a continuation of the corporate entity of the mutual or federal association and continue to have all of its property and rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 13(3); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 29; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 30; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 30; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 62; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-59.
Conversion of association organized under state law or of federal association into capital stock association; hearing on plan of conversion; notice; costs.

With respect to a conversion arising under Section 81-12-57 above, the commissioner may hold a hearing upon the plan of conversion. A hearing may be held by the commissioner on his own motion or upon application of the converting association or any member thereof and shall be held upon application by the holders of five percent (5%) or more in amount of the association’s savings accounts. All persons to whom it is proposed to issue capital stock in connection with the conversion may appear at any hearing, and notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given to all such persons in person or by mail at least thirty (30) days before the hearing by the association. Evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the notice has been given shall be submitted to the commissioner at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. Following the hearing, the commissioner may approve the terms of the plan of conversion, may reject the same or approve the same upon condition that portions thereof may be modified. All costs to the state resulting from conversions under this section shall be paid by the association making application for conversion.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 13(6); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 30; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 31; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 31; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 63; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-61.
Conversion of capital stock association organized under state law into federal association.

A capital stock association organized under this chapter may vote to convert itself into a federal mutual or capital stock savings or savings and loan association, hereinafter in this subsection referred to as a “federal association,” at any legal meeting called to consider the action. The required affirmative vote to effect the conversion shall be not less than sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the issued and outstanding stock of such association. Notice of the meeting giving the time, place and purpose thereof, together with a proxy statement and proxy form covering all matters properly brought before the meeting shall be mailed at least thirty (30) days prior thereto to the commissioner and the appropriate federal regulatory authority and to each stockholder at his last address as shown on the books of the association. A copy of the minutes of the proceedings of the meeting, verified by the affidavit of the secretary or an assistant secretary of the association, shall be filed in the office of the commissioner within ten (10) days after the date of the meeting. When filed, a verified copy of the proceedings of the meeting is presumptive evidence of the holding of the meeting and of the action taken. Any stockholder challenging the accuracy of such minutes by sworn objection may appeal to the commissioner. Within three (3) months after the date of the meeting, the association shall take such further action, in the manner prescribed and authorized by the laws of the United States, as shall make it a federal association. Three (3) copies of the charter issued by the appropriate federal regulatory authority, or three (3) copies of a certificate showing the organization of the association as a federal association, certified by the secretary or an assistant secretary of the appropriate federal regulatory authority shall be filed with the commissioner. Upon the payment of the fees prescribed by law, the commissioner shall note the filing upon each of the copies and shall retain one (1) copy in his office, file one (1) copy with the Secretary of State, and return one (1) copy to the association. The failure to file the instruments with the commissioner shall not affect the validity of the conversion. Upon the grant to any association of a charter by the appropriate federal regulatory authority, the association shall cease to be an association incorporated under this chapter and shall no longer be subject to the supervision and control of the department. All provisions regarding property and other rights contained in Section 81-12-53 above apply to the conversion of a capital stock association into a federal association.

The plan of conversion must provide:

That each savings account holder of the mutual association will receive a withdrawable account in the capital stock association equal in amount to his withdrawable account in the mutual association;

That each savings account holder of record as provided in paragraph (iii) will be entitled to receive voting stock or rights to purchase voting stock in equal proportion to the amount his account bears to all savings accounts;

That the record date fixed by the commissioner for determining savings account holders is to be used. During the month of January each year the commissioner shall publish a record date which shall be used in determining the respective interests of account holders. The date shall be not more than eighteen (18) months prior to its publication;

That the business purpose to be accomplished by the conversion is set forth with particularity;

Such other information in such form as required by the commissioner to enable him to determine whether the plan is fair and equitable to members of the association and that the interest of the savings account holders and the public is adequately protected.

A plan of conversion will not be considered unfair or inequitable merely because it contains provisions which provide:

That shares of stock will be issued to savings account holders with or without cost;

That shares of stock will be issued with cost to all savings account holders and that no stock will be issued without cost;

That savings account holders will or will not have preemptive rights to all stock proposed to be issued;

That those persons who were savings account holders during a particular number of years have preemptive rights to purchase voting stock at the fair market value thereof;

That employment contracts are provided for officers and employees of the association;

That no more than ten percent (10%) of the voting stock proposed to be issued pursuant to the plan of conversion is reserved by the association for stock options for officers and employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 13 (4, 5); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 31; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 32; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 32; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 64; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-63.
Conversion prohibited; exceptions.

No conversion of an association or a federal association, direct or indirect, shall be permitted, except as specifically authorized by this chapter, Section 81-14-101 or Section 81-5-85.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 13 (7); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 32; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 33; Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 114; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 33; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 65; Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-65.
Reorganization, merger and consolidation of associations.

Pursuant to a plan adopted by the board of directors and approved by the commissioner as equitable to the members of the association and as not impairing the usefulness and success of other properly conducted associations in the community and serving the needs of the community, an association shall have power to reorganize or to merge or consolidate with another association or federal association within its primary lending area, provided that the plan of such reorganization, merger or consolidation shall be approved at an annual meeting or at any special meeting of the members or stockholders called to consider such action by an affirmative vote of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of votes of the members or an affirmative vote of sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of those shares of stock of such association voted, in person or by proxy. Any such plan must set forth (a) the names of the associations proposing to merge or consolidate and the name of the association into which they propose to merge or consolidate, which is herein designated as “the surviving association”; (b) the terms and conditions of the proposed merger or consolidation and the mode of carrying it into effect; (c) the manner and basis of converting the savings accounts of each merging or consolidating association into savings accounts of the surviving association; (d) the manner and basis of the cancellation and issuance of the capital stock of the merging and surviving associations; (e) a statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving association to be effected by the merger or consolidation; (f) a statement of the contracts pertaining to the employment, or the retention as consultant, of officers and directors of the merged or consolidated association; and (g) such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger or consolidation as are deemed necessary or desirable by the boards of directors or the commissioner. In al l cases the corporate continuity of the resulting corporation shall possess the same incidents as that of an association which has converted in accordance with this chapter. No association, directly or indirectly, shall reorganize, merge, consolidate, or acquire substantially all of the assets of or assume substantially all of the liabilities of any financial institution or any other organization, person or entity, except as specifically authorized by this chapter. The charter of any association which does not survive a reorganization, merger or consolidation shall be surrendered to the commissioner and the Secretary of State on the effective date of such reorganization, merger, or consolidation and promptly cancelled by him.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 14; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 33; 426, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 34; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 34; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 66; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-66.
Ownership by holding company.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any stock savings association may simultaneously with its incorporation or conversion to a stock savings association provide for its ownership by a holding company. In the case of a conversion, members of the converting savings association shall have the right to purchase capital stock of the holding company in lieu of capital stock of the converted savings association in accordance with Section 81-12-61, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any stock savings association may reorganize its ownership to provide for ownership by a holding company, upon adoption of a plan of reorganization by a favorable vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board of directors of the savings association and approval of such plan of reorganization by the holders of not less than a majority of the issued and outstanding shares of stock of the savings association. The plan of reorganization shall provide that (a) the resulting ownership shall be vested in a Mississippi corporation; (b) all stockholders of the stock savings association shall have the right to exchange shares; (c) the exchange of stock shall not be subject to state or federal income taxation; (d) stockholders not wishing to exchange shares shall be entitled to dissenters’ rights as provided under Section 79-4-13.01 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972; and (e) the plan of reorganization is fair and equitable to all stockholders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-67.
Acquisition of controlling interest in capital stock association; certificate of approval; definitions; restrictions on ownership or control; reports; examinations.

In any case in which a person or group of persons propose to purchase or acquire voting stock of any capital stock association, which purchase or acquisition would cause such person or group of persons to have control, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, of the association, such person or group of persons shall first make application to the commissioner for a certificate of approval of such purchase or acquisition. The application shall contain the name and address of the proposed new owner or owners of voting stock, and the commissioner shall issue the certificate of approval only after he has become satisfied, by a hearing or otherwise, that the proposed new owner or owners of voting stock are qualified by character, experience and financial responsibility to control the association in a legal and proper manner and that the interest of the stockholders, depositors and creditors of the association and the interest of the public generally will not be jeopardized by the proposed purchase or acquisition of voting stock.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Business organization” or “company” means any corporation, partnership, trust, joint stock company or similar organization, but does not include any company the majority of the stock of which is owned by the United States or this state, by an officer of the United States or this state in his official capacity, or by an instrumentality of the United States or this state.

“Savings and loan holding company” means any company which directly or indirectly controls an association or controls any other company which is a savings and loan holding company by virtue of this section.

“Person” means an individual or company.

“Subsidiary” of a person means any company which is controlled by such person or by a company which is a subsidiary of such person by virtue of this section.

For purposes of this section, a business organization shall be deemed to have control of an association or any other business organization if the business organization:

Directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more persons or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with powers to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voting stock of such association or other business organization;

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of such association or other business organization;

Exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies of such association or other business organization.

The following restrictions shall apply to ownership or control of associations in this state:

Unless organized pursuant to the laws of this state, and not controlled by a business organization organized under the laws of another jurisdiction, no business organization shall either directly or indirectly control any association located in this state.

No business organization shall acquire control of a capital stock association located in this state without first obtaining the prior written approval of the commissioner. Prior to such acquisition, such business organization shall file an application with the commissioner containing such information as the commissioner may require and as will aid in determining that the acquisition will not be detrimental to the public interest.

Each savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary thereof shall file such reports as the commissioner may require from time to time or as required by this chapter. Each savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary thereof shall be subject to such examination as the commissioner shall prescribe or as required by this chapter. The cost of such examinations shall be assessed against such holding company and paid to the State Treasurer to the credit of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 34; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 35; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 35; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 67; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-69.
Termination of association; liquidation of assets; surrender of charter.

Subject to the limitations of Section 81-12-65 of this chapter, any association may, at any special meeting of the members or stockholders called to consider such action, terminate its existence in accordance with the provisions of this section upon an affirmative vote of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of votes of members, in the case of a mutual association, or an affirmative vote of sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of all the issued and outstanding stock, in the case of a capital stock association.

Upon such vote, five (5) copies of a certificate of dissolution, which shall state the vote cast in favor of dissolution, shall be signed by two (2) officers and acknowledged before an officer competent to take acknowledgments of deeds. Five (5) copies of such certificate shall be filed with the commissioner, who shall examine such association, and, if he finds that it is not in an impaired condition, shall so note, together with his approval of such dissolution, upon all the copies of the certificate of dissolution. The commissioner shall place a copy in the permanent files in his office, file a copy with the Secretary of State, and return the remaining copies to the parties filing the same.

Upon such approval, the association shall be dissolved and shall cease to carry on business but nevertheless shall continue as a corporate entity for the sole purpose of paying, satisfying and discharging existing liabilities and obligations, collecting and distributing assets, and doing all acts required to adjust, wind up and dissolve its business and affairs.

The board of directors shall act as trustees for liquidation as provided in this section. They shall proceed as quickly as may be practicable to wind up the affairs of the association and, to the extent necessary or expedient to that end, shall exercise all the powers of such dissolved association and, without prejudice to the generality of such authority, may fill vacancies, elect officers, carry out the contracts, make new contracts, borrow money, mortgage or pledge the property, sell its assets at public or private sale, or compromise claims in favor of or against the association, apply assets to the discharge of liabilities, distribute assets either in cash or in kind among savings account members or savings account holders according to their respective pro rata interests after paying or adequately providing for the payment of other liabilities, distribute assets either in cash or in kind among stockholders, and perform all acts necessary or expedient to the winding up of the association. Provided, however, that upon liquidation, savings account holders shall be first paid the value of their accounts, if such funds are available, before any sums are paid to the stockholders. All deeds or other instruments shall be in the name of the association and executed by the president or a vice president and the secretary or an assistant secretary. The board of directors shall also have power to exchange or otherwise dispose of or to put in trust all or substantially all or any part of the assets, upon such terms and conditions and for such considerations, which may be money, stock, bonds, shares or accounts of any insured association, or of any federal association, or other instruments for the payment of money, or other property, or other considerations, as the board of directors may deem reasonable or expedient, and may distribute such considerations or the proceeds thereof, or trust receipts, or certificates of beneficial interest among the savings account members or savings account holders in proportion to their pro rata interests therein.

The association, during the liquidation of the assets of the association by the board of directors, shall continue to be subject to the supervision of the commissioner, and the board of directors shall report the progress of such liquidation to the commissioner from time to time as he may require. Upon completion of liquidation, the board of directors shall file with the commissioner a final report and accounting of such liquidation and shall surrender the charter of the association. If such report is approved, the commissioner shall promptly cancel said charter. The approval of such report by the commissioner shall operate as a discharge of the board of directors and each member thereof in connection with the liquidation of such association. No such dissolution or any action of the board of directors in connection therewith shall impair any contract right between such association and any borrower or other person or persons or the vested rights of any member or savings account holder of such association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 16; reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 35; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 36; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 36; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 68; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-71.
Annual meeting of members of association; voting; quorum.

An annual meeting of the members of each mutual association shall be held as fixed in the bylaws of such association. Special meetings may be called as provided in the bylaws.

The members who shall be entitled to vote at any meeting of the members shall be those who are members of record at the end of the calendar month next preceding the date of the meeting of members, except those who have ceased to be members. The number of votes which members shall be entitled to cast shall be in accordance with the books on the said date determinative of entitlement to vote.

In the determination of all questions requiring action by the members, each member shall be entitled to cast one (1) vote, plus an additional vote for each One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or fraction thereof of the withdrawal value of savings accounts, if any, held by such member. No member, however, shall cast more than four hundred (400) votes.

Voting by proxy at a meeting shall be permitted as set forth in the bylaws of the association. Constitution of a quorum shall be set forth in the bylaws of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 17; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 36; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 37; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 37; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 69; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-73.
Annual meeting of stockholders of capital stock associations; notice; voting; quorum.

An annual meeting of stockholders of capital stock associations shall be held as fixed in the bylaws of the association. Whenever the provisions of this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws require or authorize the stockholders to take any action at an annual or special meeting, a notice of such meeting, signed by the secretary or other officer permitted by the bylaws, shall be mailed to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting, at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the date set for such meeting. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may require that such notice also be published in one or more newspapers. The notice shall state the purpose of the meeting, a general statement of the business to be transacted, and the time and place it is to be held. Such notice shall be sufficient for said meeting and any adjournment thereof unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. If any stockholder shall transfer any of his stock after notice, it shall not be necessary to notify the transferee. Such meetings shall be held within the state and within the county in which the home office of the association is located. Any stockholder may waive notice of any meeting either before, at or after the meeting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, every such stockholder shall be entitled at such meeting, and upon each proposal presented at such meeting, to one (1) vote for each share of voting stock recorded in his name on the books of the corporation on the record date fixed as above provided or, if no such record date was fixed, on the day of meeting. The books of record of stockholders shall be produced at any stockholders’ meeting upon the request of any stockholder.

The stockholders record date and voting by proxy at any meeting shall be established and permitted, respectively, as set forth in the bylaws of the association. Constitution of a quorum shall be set forth in the bylaws of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 18; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 37; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 38; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 38; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 70; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-75.
Membership fees prohibited.

An association shall not directly or indirectly charge any membership, admission, withdrawal or any other fee or sum of money for the privilege of becoming, remaining or ceasing to be a member or savings account holder of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 19; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 38; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 39; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 39; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 71; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-77.
Inspection of books and records of association; confidential nature of certain books and records; access by members; procedure for members to communicate with other members with reference to questions to be presented at annual meeting.

Every member, savings account holder or borrower shall have the right to inspect the books and records of an association as pertain to his loan or savings account. Otherwise, the right of inspection and examination of the books and records shall be limited (a) to the commissioner or his duly authorized representatives as provided in this chapter, (b) to persons duly authorized to act for the association, (c) officers and directors of the association, and (d) to any federal or state instrumentality or agency authorized to inspect or examine the books and records of an insured association. The books and records pertaining to the accounts and loans of members, savings account holders, and borrowers shall be kept confidential by the association, its directors, officers and employees, and by the commissioner, his examiners and representatives, except where the disclosure thereof shall be compelled by a court of competent jurisdiction, and no member or any other person shall have access to the books and records or shall be furnished or shall possess a partial or complete list of the members, savings account holders, or borrowers except upon express action and authority of the board of directors. This shall in no way be construed to prevent the commissioner from performing his duties under this chapter in any form permitted by law.

In the event, however, that any member or members desire to communicate with the other members of the association with reference to any question pending or to be presented for consideration at a meeting of the members, the association shall furnish upon request a statement of the approximate number of members of the association at the time of such request, and an estimate of the cost of forwarding such communication. The requesting member or members shall then submit the communication, together with a sworn statement that the proposed communication is not for any reason other than the business welfare of the association, to the commissioner who, if he finds it to be appropriate, truthful and in the best interests of the association and its members, shall execute a certificate setting out such findings, forward the certificate together with the communication, which may be sealed and its contents protected, to the association, and direct that the communication be prepared an d mailed by the association to the members upon the requesting member’s or members’ payment to it of the expense of such preparation and mailing. If the commissioner finds such proposed communication to be inappropriate, untruthful or contrary to the best interests of the association and its members, he shall have the discretion to make any disposition of the request to communicate which he deems proper and he shall execute a certificate setting out such findings and deliver it to the requesting member together with his order making disposition of the request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 20; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 39; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 40; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 40; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 72; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-79.
Call reports.

The commissioner shall call upon each association for the reports required in this section. Such calls shall be made by the commissioner in writing by letter or other similar means of written communications for the same dates and as often as calls are issued by the appropriate federal regulating authority for reports from federal associations. The commissioner shall prescribe the forms for such reports. The reports shall be sworn to by either the president, vice president or cashier of the association making them, attested by not less than two (2) of the board of directors, and shall exhibit in detail, under appropriate heads, the total resources and total liabilities of the association on the day specified by the commissioner. Associations shall transmit to the department such call reports within a time limitation established by regulation by the commissioner; however, such time limitation cannot exceed that set by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for state insured associations. For any failure or delay in furnishing this report, the president, vice president or cashier of any such association, so in default, and the members of the board of directors of the association refusing to attest the report, shall be subject to an administrative fine, which may be imposed by the commissioner, of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) a day for each day while in such default.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 21; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 40; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 41; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 41; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 73; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-81.
Board of directors to direct business of association; number and qualifications of members; oath; procedure for filling vacancies.

The business of the mutual association shall be directed by a board of directors of not less than five (5) nor more than fifteen (15) as determined by, and elected by, ballot from among the members by a plurality of the votes of the members present or voting by proxy. At all times at least two-thirds (2/3) of the directors shall be bona fide residents of this state.

In order to qualify as a director, a member of an association must hold individually, or jointly with his spouse, a savings account, the withdrawal value of which is at least Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); provided that if the assets of the association exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), the withdrawal value of such account must be at least One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). No member shall be eligible for election or shall serve as a director or officer of an association who has been convicted of a criminal offense involving dishonesty or a breach of trust. A director shall cease to be a director when he ceases to be a member, or when he is adjudicated a bankrupt or is convicted of a criminal offense as herein provided, or when the net equity above loans of all savings accounts in the association held by him aggregates for a period of thirty (30) consecutive days less than the minimum required to be eligible for election as a director, but no action of the board of directors shall be invalidated through the participation of such director in such action unless the vote of such director be challenged prior to such action; provided that if a director becomes ineligible under the terms of this subsection by reason of the exercise by the association of the right of redemption of savings accounts provided for in Section 81-12-153 he shall remain validly in office until the expiration of his term or until he otherwise becomes ineligible, resigns or is removed, whichever may occur first.

Directors shall be classified as set forth in the bylaws of the association.

The authorized number of directors determined by the members within the limits hereinabove specified may subsequently be increased or decreased only by vote of the members.

Each director, upon assuming office, shall take an oath that he will, so far as the duty devolves on him, diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the association and will not knowingly violate or permit to be violated, any of the provisions of this chapter, and a written copy of such oath shall be filed with the commissioner.

If the members fail to elect a director to fill each vacancy created by any such increase, the directors may fill such vacancy by electing a director to serve until the next annual meeting of the members, at which time a director shall be elected to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the class of director in which such vacancy exists.

Whenever under the provisions hereof the number of directors is changed and vacancies caused by such change are filled, the directors so elected shall be classified in accordance with the provisions of the bylaws of the association.

Any vacancy among directors, not so filled by the members, may be filled by a majority vote of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum, by electing a director to serve until the next annual meeting of the members, at which time a director shall be elected to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term for the class of director in which such vacancy exists. In event of a vacancy on the board of directors from any cause, the remaining directors shall have full power and authority to continue direction of the association until such vacancy is filled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 22; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 41; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 42; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 42; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 74; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2001.